Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1407.04
Special permit for sale at other
than established place of business; approval; conditions.

The
event for which a
permit is sought under section
60-1407.03 must be approved by the board. In determining approval,
the board shall consider the size, location, duration, sponsors, and purpose
of the event. Approval shall not be given to any event sponsored solely by
a dealer or dealers or
for which the sole or primary purpose is the sale of motor vehicles, motorcycles, trailers, or self-propelled
mobile homes.

Laws 1972, LB 1335, § 17;

Laws 2010, LB816, § 64.